New Jersey, session 221, A1288.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  Both Hamas and Hezbollah are recognized by the United States Department of State as Foreign Terrorist Organizations; b.  On October 7, 2023, Hamas launched a surprise attack to deliberately target Israeli civilians, including the killing and abduction of men, women, children, and the elderly; c.  Hamas stated goal is the entire destruction of the State of Israel and the murder of its Jewish citizens; d.  A disturbing number of student organizations of institutions of higher education placed blame solely upon the State of Israel for the attack and expressed support for the terrorist actions of Hamas through the glorification of violence and the use of antisemitic rhetoric; e.  Many administrations of institutions of higher education do not follow the practice of institutional neutrality and frequently speak out on public issues, but have failed to speak out clearly in support of Israel after the October 7 attack by Hamas, and have exposed their lack of regard for their Jewish and pro-Israel students; and f.  The glorification of violence and use of antisemitic rhetoric, a form of hate speech, creates a hostile learning and working environment for Jewish students, faculty, and staff. 2.    a. As used in this section, antisemitism means the same as the term is defined in the working definition of antisemitism adopted by the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance on May 26, 2016. b. An institution of higher education shall not authorize, facilitate, provide funding for, or otherwise support any event or organization promoting antisemitism or hate speech on campus. 3. This act shall take effect immediately.